Utah statutes.
51-4-2.   Deposits by political subdivisions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Officer" means each:
(i)  county treasurer, county auditor, county assessor, county clerk, clerk of
the district court, city treasurer, city clerk, justice court judge; and
(ii)  other officer of a political subdivision.
(b)  "Political subdivision" means a county, city, town, school district,
local district, and special service district.
(2) (a)  Each officer shall deposit all public funds daily whenever
practicable but not later than three days after receipt.
(b)  Each officer shall deposit all public funds only in qualified
depositories unless the public funds need to be deposited in a bank outside
Utah in order to provide for:
(i)  payment of maturing bonds or other evidences of indebtedness; or
(ii)  payment of the interest on bonds or other evidences of indebtedness.
(3) (a) (i)  Each officer shall require all checks to be made payable to the
office of the officer receiving funds or to the political subdivision's
treasurer.
(ii)  An officer may not accept a check unless it is made payable to the
office of the officer receiving funds or to the political subdivision's
treasurer.
(b)  Each officer shall deposit all monies he collects into an account
controlled by his political subdivision's treasurer.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b) and unless a shorter time for
depositing funds is otherwise required by law, each political subdivision that
has collected funds that are due to the state or to another political
subdivision of the state shall, on or before the tenth day of each month, pay
all of those funds that were receipted during the last month:
(i)  to a qualified depository for the credit of the appropriate public
treasurer; or
(ii)  to the appropriate public treasurer.
(b)  Property tax collections shall be apportioned and paid according to
Section 59-2-1365.
